Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2060.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding sections to read:Section 459.2. Pain Parity in Medicaid.--(a) In establishing and maintaining the uniform Statewide preferred drug list under section 459.1, the department shall ensure that no non-opioid drug approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment or management of pain shall be disadvantaged or discouraged with respect to coverage relative to any opioid or narcotic drug for the treatment or management of pain on the uniform Statewide preferred drug list, where impermissible disadvantaging or discouragement includes, without 12345678910111213141516171819 limitation, designating any non-opioid drug as a nonpreferred drug if any opioid or narcotic drug is designated as a preferred drug or establishing more restrictive or more extensive utilization controls, including, but not limited to, more restrictive or more extensive prior authorization or step therapy requirements for a non-opioid drug than the least restrictive or extensive utilization controls applicable to any opioid or narcotic drug.(b) This section shall apply to a non-opioid drug immediately upon its approval by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment or management of pain, regardless of whether the drug has been reviewed by the department for inclusion on the uniform Statewide preferred drug list. This section shall apply to drugs being provided under a contract between the department and any managed care organization.Section 459.3. Pain Parity in Commercial Insurance.--(a) In establishing and maintaining a formulary or preferred drug list, a commercial insurer shall ensure that no non-opioid drug approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment or management of pain shall be disadvantaged or discouraged, with respect to coverage or cost sharing, relative to any opioid or narcotic drug for the treatment or management of pain on the formulary or preferred drug list, where impermissible disadvantaging or discouragement includes, without limitation:(1) i mposing more restrictive coverage criteria on any non- opioid drug than the least restrictive coverage criteria imposed on an opioid or narcotic drug;(2) establishing more restrictive or more extensive 20250HB2060PN2644 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 utilization controls, including, but not limited to, more restrictive or more extensive prior authorization or step therapy requirements for a non-opioid drug than the least restrictive or extensive utilization controls applicable to any opioid or narcotic drug; or(3) if an insurer maintains a formulary or preferred drug list grouped into tiers for the purposes of determining cost sharing, placing any non-opioid drug on a tier that requires a cost-sharing responsibility that exceeds the lowest cost-sharing responsibility required for any opioid or narcotic drug on the formulary.(b) This section shall apply to a non-opioid drug immediately upon its approval by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment or management of pain.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2060PN2644 - 3 - 123456789101112131415